ani_nouns.twol
Alphabet
    %{rm.before.erg%}:0 
    %{erg%}:0
    >:>
    у:0 у:у;

Rules

"Remove vowel before erg"
у:0 <=> _ %{rm.before.erg%}:0 >:> %{erg%}:0;

"Remove %{rm.before.erg%}"
%{rm.before.erg%}:0 <=> _ ;

"Remove %{erg%}"
%{erg%}:0 <=> _ ;
